District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.02

Application.

This subchapter shall apply only to the construction services industry.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 202
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.